District of Columbia statutes.
29-914

Voting — Proxy prohibited.

A member shall not vote by proxy.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-925.
2001 Ed., § 29-914.
1981 Ed., § 29-1114.
1973 Ed., § 29-814.